Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
Cross references.

Prohibition against campaign activities by officers and employees of state while traveling in vehicles for which state is paying transportation mileage, §

50-19-8

.

Law reviews.

For article, “An Analysis of the Georgia Election Code,” see 1 Ga. St. B. J. 299 (1965).

For article, “Reasonable Restrictions on the Franchise: Georgia’s Voter Identification Act of 2006,” see 63 Mercer L. Rev. 1129 (2012).

For article, “Judging Congressional Elections,” see 51 Ga. L. Rev. 359 (2017).

For article, “The Independent State Legislature Doctrine, Federal Elections, and State Constitutions,” see 55 Ga. L. Rev. 1 (2020).

For article, “

Rucho

for Minimalists,” see
71 Mercer L. Rev. 695 (2020).

For article, “Racially Neutral in Form, Racially Discriminatory in Fact: The Implications for Voting Rights of Giving Disproportionate Racial Impact the Constitutional Importance It Deserves,” see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 811 (2020).

For comment, “Voter Suppression Post-

Shelby

: Impacts and Issues of Voter Purge and Voter ID Laws,” see 71 Mercer L. Rev. 857 (2020).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

For article, “SB 221: The Creation of Election Leadership Committees,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 155 (2021).